Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 2. PROTECTION OF LABORERS

SUBTITLE A. EMPLOYMENT DISCRIMINATION

CHAPTER 23. VOLUNTARY VETERAN'S EMPLOYMENT PREFERENCE FOR PRIVATE EMPLOYERS

Sec. 23.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "veteran" means an individual who:

(1) has served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States; and

(2) was honorably discharged from military service.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 195 (S.B. 805), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 816 (H.B. 3547), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 23.002. VOLUNTARY PREFERENCE POLICY. (a) A private employer may adopt a policy under which the employer may give a preference in employment decisions regarding hiring, promotion, or retention to a veteran over another qualified applicant or employee.

(b) A policy adopted under this section must be in writing.

(c) A private employer may provide notice to the Texas Workforce Commission or the Texas Veterans Commission that the employer has adopted a policy under this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 195 (S.B. 805), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 816 (H.B. 3547), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 387 (S.B. 588), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 23.003. APPLICATION OF POLICY.

(a) A private employer shall apply any policy adopted under this chapter reasonably and in good faith in employment decisions regarding hiring, promotion, or retention during a reduction in the employer's workforce.

(b) A private employer may require appropriate documentation from a veteran for the veteran to be eligible for the preference under a policy adopted under this chapter.

(c) Granting a preference in accordance with a policy adopted under this chapter does not violate Chapter 21.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 195 (S.B. 805), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 816 (H.B. 3547), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 11.001, eff. September 1, 2017.